Illinois, session 104th, HB2780.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-110.16 and by adding Section 1-110.13 as 6follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/1-110.13 new)8    Sec. 1-110.13. Transactions prohibited by retirement 9systems; Hamas. 10    (a) The Government of the United States has determined 11that Hamas is a Foreign Terrorist Organization that sponsors 12terrorism and genocide. The General Assembly finds that acts 13of terrorism have caused injury and death to Illinois and 14United States residents who serve in the United States 15military, and pose a significant threat to safety and health 16in Illinois. The General Assembly finds that public employees 17and their families, including police officers and 18firefighters, are more likely than others to be affected by 19acts of terrorism. The General Assembly finds that Hamas 20continues to solicit investment and commercial activities by 21forbidden entities, including private market funds. The 22General Assembly finds that investments in forbidden entities 23are inherently and unduly risky, not in the interests of   HB2780- 2 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1public pensioners and Illinois taxpayers, and against public 2policy. The General Assembly finds that Hamas's capacity to 3sponsor terrorism and genocide depends on or is supported by 4the activities of forbidden entities. The General Assembly 5further finds and re-affirms that the people of the State, 6acting through their representatives, do not want to be 7associated with forbidden entities, genocide, and terrorism.8    (b) For purposes of this Section:9    "Business operations" means maintaining, selling, or 10leasing equipment, facilities, personnel, or any other 11apparatus of business or commerce to Hamas.12    "Certifying company" means a company that (1) directly 13provides asset management services or advice to a retirement 14system or (2) as directly authorized or requested by a 15retirement system (A) identifies particular investment options 16for consideration or approval; (B) chooses particular 17investment options; or (C) allocates particular amounts to be 18invested. If no company meets the criteria set forth in this 19paragraph, then "certifying company" means the retirement 20system officer who, as designated by the board, executes the 21investment decisions made by the board, or, in the 22alternative, the company that the board authorizes to complete 23the certification as the agent of that officer.24    "Company" is any entity capable of affecting commerce, 25including, but not limited to: (i) a government, governmental 26agency, natural person, legal person, sole proprietorship,   HB2780- 3 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1partnership, firm, corporation, subsidiary, affiliate, 2franchisor, franchisee, joint venture, trade association, 3financial institution, utility, public franchise, provider of 4financial services, trust, or enterprise; and (ii) any 5association thereof.6    "Division" means the Public Pension Division of the 7Department of Insurance.8    "Forbidden entity" means any of the following:9        (1) Hamas;10        (2) any company or entity that is wholly or partially 11    managed or controlled by Hamas;12        (3) any company (i) identified by the Office of 13    Foreign Assets Control in the United States Department of 14    the Treasury as sponsoring terrorist activities in 15    conjunction with Hamas or, with regard to Hamas, under the 16    Global Terrorism Sanctions Regulations (31 CFR Part 594) 17    or the Foreign Terrorist Organization Sanctions 18    Regulations (31 CFR Part 597); or (ii) fined, penalized, 19    or sanctioned by the Office of Foreign Assets Control in 20    the United States Department of the Treasury for any 21    violation of any United States rules and restrictions 22    relating to Hamas that occurred at any time following the 23    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 24    Assembly; or25        (4) any company that has business operations that 26    involve contracts with or the provision of supplies or   HB2780- 4 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1    services to Hamas, companies in which Hamas has any direct 2    or indirect equity share, or consortiums or projects 3    commissioned by Hamas.4    "Forbidden entity" does not include: (A) mutual funds that 5meet the requirements of item (iii) of paragraph (13) of 6Section 1-113.2; and (B) companies that transact business with 7Hamas under the law, license, or permit of the United States, 8including a license from the United States Department of the 9Treasury, and companies, except Hamas, that are certified as 10Non-Government Organizations by the United Nations or that 11engage solely in (i) the provision of goods and services 12intended to relieve human suffering or to promote welfare, 13health, religious and spiritual activities, and education or 14humanitarian purposes; or (ii) journalistic activities.15    "Hamas" means the organizations commonly known as Hamas 16and Palestinian Islamic Jihad that are subject to sanction or 17other restrictions placed on commercial activity imposed by 18the United States government due to an executive or 19congressional declaration as a Foreign Terrorist Organization.20    "Private market fund" means any private equity fund, 21private equity fund of funds, venture capital fund, hedge 22fund, hedge fund of funds, real estate fund, or other 23investment vehicle that is not publicly traded.24    "Retirement system" means the General Assembly Retirement 25System, the State Employees' Retirement System of Illinois, 26the State Universities Retirement System, the Teachers'   HB2780- 5 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1Retirement System of the State of Illinois, and the Judges 2Retirement System of Illinois.3    (c) A retirement system shall not transfer or disburse 4funds to, deposit into, acquire any bonds or commercial paper 5from, or otherwise loan to or invest in any entity unless, as 6provided in this Section, a certifying company certifies to 7the retirement system that, (1) with respect to investments in 8a publicly traded company, the certifying company has relied 9on information provided by an independent researching firm 10that specializes in global security risk and (2) 100% of the 11retirement system's assets for which the certifying company 12provides services or advice are not and have not been invested 13or reinvested in any forbidden entity at any time after 4 14months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 15104th General Assembly.16    The certifying company shall make the certification 17required under this subsection (c) to a retirement system 6 18months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 19104th General Assembly and annually thereafter. A retirement 20system shall submit the certifications to the Division, and 21the Division shall notify the Director of Insurance if a 22retirement system fails to do so.23    (d) In addition to any other penalties and remedies 24available under State or federal law, any transaction that 25violates the provisions of this Section shall be against 26public policy and voidable, at the sole discretion of the   HB2780- 6 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1retirement system.2    (e) This Section shall have full force and effect during 3any period in which Hamas, or the officials of Hamas, are 4subject to sanctions authorized under any statute or executive 5order of the United States or until the State Department of the 6United States confirms in the federal register or through 7other means that Hamas is no longer subject to sanctions by the 8government of the United States.9    (f) If any provision of this Section or its application to 10any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of 11that provision or application does not affect other provisions 12or applications of this Section that can be given effect 13without the invalid provision or application. 14    (40 ILCS 5/1-110.16)15    Sec. 1-110.16. Transactions prohibited by retirement 16systems; companies that boycott Israel, for-profit companies 17that contract to shelter migrant children, Iran-restricted 18companies, Sudan-restricted companies, Hamas-restricted 19companies, expatriated entities, companies that are domiciled 20or have their principal place of business in Russia or 21Belarus, and companies that are subject to Russian Harmful 22Foreign Activities Sanctions.23    (a) As used in this Section:24    "Boycott Israel" means engaging in actions that are 25politically motivated and are intended to penalize, inflict   HB2780- 7 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1economic harm on, or otherwise limit commercial relations with 2the State of Israel or companies based in the State of Israel 3or in territories controlled by the State of Israel.4    "Company" means any sole proprietorship, organization, 5association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited 6partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability 7company, or other entity or business association, including 8all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, 9parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business 10associations, that exist for the purpose of making profit.11    "Company that is subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 12Activities Sanctions" means a company that is subject to 13sanctions under the Russian Harmful Foreign Activities 14Sanctions Regulations (31 CFR Part 587), any Presidential 15Executive Order imposing sanctions against Russia, or any 16federal directive issued pursuant to any such Executive Order. 17    "Contract to shelter migrant children" means entering into 18a contract with the federal government to shelter migrant 19children under the federal Unaccompanied Alien Children 20Program or a substantially similar federal program. 21    "Direct holdings" in a company means all publicly traded 22securities of that company that are held directly by the 23retirement system in an actively managed account or fund in 24which the retirement system owns all shares or interests.25    "Expatriated entity" has the meaning ascribed to it in 26Section 1-15.120 of the Illinois Procurement Code.   HB2780- 8 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1    "Hamas-restricted company" means a company that meets the 2qualifications under Section 1-110.13 of this Code. 3    "Illinois Investment Policy Board" means the board 4established under subsection (b) of this Section. 5    "Indirect holdings" in a company means all securities of 6that company that are held in an account or fund, such as a 7mutual fund, managed by one or more persons not employed by the 8retirement system, in which the retirement system owns shares 9or interests together with other investors not subject to the 10provisions of this Section or that are held in an index fund.11    "Iran-restricted company" means a company that meets the 12qualifications under Section 1-110.15 of this Code.13    "Private market fund" means any private equity fund, 14private equity funds of funds, venture capital fund, hedge 15fund, hedge fund of funds, real estate fund, or other 16investment vehicle that is not publicly traded.17    "Restricted companies" means companies that boycott 18Israel, for-profit companies that contract to shelter migrant 19children, Iran-restricted companies, Sudan-restricted 20companies, Hamas-restricted companies, expatriated entities, 21companies that are domiciled or have their principal place of 22business in Russia or Belarus, and companies that are subject 23to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions.24    "Retirement system" means a retirement system established 25under Article 2, 14, 15, 16, or 18 of this Code or the Illinois 26State Board of Investment.  HB2780- 9 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1    "Sudan-restricted company" means a company that meets the 2qualifications under Section 1-110.6 of this Code.3    (b) There shall be established an Illinois Investment 4Policy Board. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall 5consist of 7 members. Each board of a pension fund or 6investment board created under Article 15, 16, or 22A of this 7Code shall appoint one member, and the Governor shall appoint 84 members. The Governor shall designate one member of the 9Board as the Chairperson. 10    (b-5) The term of office of each member appointed by the 11Governor, who is serving on the Board on June 30, 2022, is 12abolished on that date. The terms of office of members 13appointed by the Governor after June 30, 2022 shall be as 14follows: 2 initial members shall be appointed for terms of 2 15years, and 2 initial members shall be appointed for terms of 4 16years. Thereafter, the members appointed by the Governor shall 17hold office for 4 years, except that any member chosen to fill 18a vacancy occurring otherwise than by expiration of a term 19shall be appointed only for the unexpired term of the member 20whom he or she shall succeed. Board members may be 21reappointed. The Governor may remove a Governor's appointee to 22the Board for incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance, or 23inability to serve. 24    (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 25beginning January 1, 2016, Sections 1-110.15 and 1-110.6 of 26this Code shall be administered in accordance with this   HB2780- 10 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1Section.2    (d) By April 1, 2016, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 3shall make its best efforts to identify all Iran-restricted 4companies, Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that 5boycott Israel and assemble those identified companies into a 6list of restricted companies, to be distributed to each 7retirement system.8    These efforts shall include the following, as appropriate 9in the Illinois Investment Policy Board's judgment:10        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 11    information regarding Iran-restricted companies, 12    Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that boycott 13    Israel, including information provided by nonprofit 14    organizations, research firms, and government entities;15        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 16    retirement systems that invest in Iran-restricted 17    companies, Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that 18    boycott Israel;19        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 20    divested from or engaged with Iran-restricted companies, 21    Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that boycott 22    Israel; and23        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 24    Iran-restricted companies, Sudan-restricted companies, 25    and companies that boycott Israel.26    The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall review the list   HB2780- 11 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1of restricted companies on a quarterly basis based on evolving 2information from, among other sources, those listed in this 3subsection (d) and distribute any updates to the list of 4restricted companies to the retirement systems and the State 5Treasurer.6    By April 1, 2018, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 7shall make its best efforts to identify all expatriated 8entities and include those companies in the list of restricted 9companies distributed to each retirement system and the State 10Treasurer. These efforts shall include the following, as 11appropriate in the Illinois Investment Policy Board's 12judgment:13        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 14    information regarding expatriated entities, including 15    information provided by nonprofit organizations, research 16    firms, and government entities;17        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 18    retirement systems that invest in expatriated entities;19        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 20    divested from or engaged with expatriated entities; and21        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 22    expatriated entities. 23    By July 1, 2022, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 24shall make its best efforts to identify all for-profit 25companies that contract to shelter migrant children and 26include those companies in the list of restricted companies   HB2780- 12 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1distributed to each retirement system. These efforts shall 2include the following, as appropriate in the Illinois 3Investment Policy Board's judgment: 4        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 5    information regarding for-profit companies that contract 6    to shelter migrant children, including information 7    provided by nonprofit organizations, research firms, and 8    government entities;9        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 10    retirement systems that invest in for-profit companies 11    that contract to shelter migrant children; 12        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 13    divested from or engaged with for-profit companies that 14    contract to shelter migrant children; and15        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 16    for-profit companies that contract to shelter migrant 17    children. 18    No later than 6 months after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Illinois 20Investment Policy Board shall make its best efforts to 21identify all companies that are domiciled or have their 22principal place of business in Russia or Belarus and companies 23that are subject to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities 24Sanctions and include those companies in the list of 25restricted companies distributed to each retirement system. 26These efforts shall include the following, as appropriate in   HB2780- 13 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1the Illinois Investment Policy Board's judgment: 2        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 3    information regarding companies that are domiciled or have 4    their principal place of business in Russia or Belarus and 5    companies that are subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 6    Activities Sanctions, including information provided by 7    nonprofit organizations, research firms, and government 8    entities; 9        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 10    retirement systems that invest in companies that are 11    domiciled or have their principal place of business in 12    Russia or Belarus and companies that are subject to 13    Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions; 14        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 15    divested from or engaged with companies that are domiciled 16    or have their principal place of business in Russia or 17    Belarus and companies that are subject to Russian Harmful 18    Foreign Activities Sanctions; and 19        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 20    companies that are domiciled or have their principal place 21    of business in Russia or Belarus and companies that are 22    subject to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions. 23    No later than 6 months after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Illinois 25Investment Policy Board shall make its best efforts to 26identify all Hamas-restricted companies and include those   HB2780- 14 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1companies in the list of restricted companies distributed to 2each retirement system. 3    (e) The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall adhere to 4the following procedures for companies on the list of 5restricted companies:6        (1) For each company newly identified in subsection 7    (d), the Illinois Investment Policy Board, unless it 8    determines by an affirmative vote that it is unfeasible, 9    shall send a written notice informing the company of its 10    status and that it may become subject to divestment or 11    shareholder activism by the retirement systems.12        (2) If, following the Illinois Investment Policy 13    Board's engagement pursuant to this subsection (e) with a 14    restricted company, that company ceases activity that 15    designates the company to be an Iran-restricted company, a 16    Sudan-restricted company, a company that boycotts Israel, 17    an expatriated entity, or a for-profit company that 18    contracts to shelter migrant children, the company shall 19    be removed from the list of restricted companies and the 20    provisions of this Section shall cease to apply to it 21    unless it resumes such activities.22        (3) For a company that is domiciled or has its 23    principal place of business in Russia or Belarus, if, 24    following the Illinois Investment Policy Board's 25    engagement pursuant to this subsection (e), that company 26    is no longer domiciled or has its principal place of   HB2780- 15 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1    business in Russia or Belarus, the company shall be 2    removed from the list of restricted companies and the 3    provisions of this Section shall cease to apply to it 4    unless it becomes domiciled or has its principal place of 5    business in Russia or Belarus. 6        (4) For a company that is subject to Russian Harmful 7    Foreign Activities Sanctions, if, following the Illinois 8    Investment Policy Board's engagement pursuant to this 9    subsection (e), that company is no longer subject to 10    Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions, the company 11    shall be removed from the list of restricted companies and 12    the provisions of this Section shall cease to apply to it 13    unless it becomes subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 14    Activities Sanctions. 15    (f) Except as provided in subsection (f-1) of this Section 16the retirement system shall adhere to the following procedures 17for companies on the list of restricted companies:18        (1) The retirement system shall identify those 19    companies on the list of restricted companies in which the 20    retirement system owns direct holdings and indirect 21    holdings.22        (2) The retirement system shall instruct its 23    investment advisors to sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw 24    all direct holdings of restricted companies from the 25    retirement system's assets under management in an orderly 26    and fiduciarily responsible manner within 12 months after   HB2780- 16 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1    the company's most recent appearance on the list of 2    restricted companies.3        (3) The retirement system may not acquire securities 4    of restricted companies.5        (4) The provisions of this subsection (f) do not apply 6    to the retirement system's indirect holdings or private 7    market funds. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall 8    submit letters to the managers of those investment funds 9    containing restricted companies requesting that they 10    consider removing the companies from the fund or create a 11    similar actively managed fund having indirect holdings 12    devoid of the companies. If the manager creates a similar 13    fund, the retirement system shall replace all applicable 14    investments with investments in the similar fund in an 15    expedited timeframe consistent with prudent investing 16    standards.17    (f-1) The retirement system shall adhere to the following 18procedures for restricted companies that are expatriated 19entities or for-profit companies that contract to shelter 20migrant children:21        (1) To the extent that the retirement system believes 22    that shareholder activism would be more impactful than 23    divestment, the retirement system shall have the authority 24    to engage with a restricted company prior to divesting.25        (2) Subject to any applicable State or Federal laws, 26    methods of shareholder activism utilized by the retirement   HB2780- 17 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1    system may include, but are not limited to, bringing 2    shareholder resolutions and proxy voting on shareholder 3    resolutions.4        (3) The retirement system shall report on its 5    shareholder activism and the outcome of such efforts to 6    the Illinois Investment Policy Board by April 1 of each 7    year.8        (4) If the engagement efforts of the retirement system 9    are unsuccessful, then it shall adhere to the procedures 10    under subsection (f) of this Section. 11    (f-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 12Act of the 102nd General Assembly, no retirement system shall 13invest moneys in Russian or Belarusian sovereign debt, Russian 14or Belarusian government-backed securities, any investment 15instrument issued by an entity that is domiciled or has its 16principal place of business in Russia or Belarus, or any 17investment instrument issued by a company that is subject to 18Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions, and no 19retirement system shall invest or deposit State moneys in any 20bank that is domiciled or has its principal place of business 21in Russia or Belarus. As soon as practicable after the 22effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 23Assembly, each retirement system shall instruct its investment 24advisors to sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw all direct 25holdings of Russian or Belarusian sovereign debt and direct 26holdings of Russian or Belarusian government-backed securities   HB2780- 18 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1from the retirement system's assets under management in an 2orderly and fiduciarily responsible manner.3    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 4contrary, a retirement system may cease divestment pursuant to 5this subsection (f-5) if clear and convincing evidence shows 6that the value of investments in such Russian or Belarusian 7sovereign debt and Russian or Belarusian government-backed 8securities becomes equal to or less than 0.05% of the market 9value of all assets under management by the retirement system. 10For any cessation of divestment authorized by this subsection 11(f-5), the retirement system shall provide a written notice to 12the Illinois Investment Policy Board in advance of the 13cessation of divestment, setting forth the reasons and 14justification, supported by clear and convincing evidence, for 15its decision to cease divestment under this subsection (f-5). 16    The provisions of this subsection (f-5) do not apply to 17the retirement system's indirect holdings or private market 18funds. 19    (g) Upon request, and by April 1 of each year, each 20retirement system shall provide the Illinois Investment Policy 21Board with information regarding investments sold, redeemed, 22divested, or withdrawn in compliance with this Section.23    (h) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 24contrary, a retirement system may cease divesting from 25companies pursuant to subsection (f) if clear and convincing 26evidence shows that the value of investments in such companies   HB2780- 19 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1becomes equal to or less than 0.5% of the market value of all 2assets under management by the retirement system. For any 3cessation of divestment authorized by this subsection (h), the 4retirement system shall provide a written notice to the 5Illinois Investment Policy Board in advance of the cessation 6of divestment, setting forth the reasons and justification, 7supported by clear and convincing evidence, for its decision 8to cease divestment under subsection (f). 9    (i) The cost associated with the activities of the 10Illinois Investment Policy Board shall be borne by the boards 11of each pension fund or investment board created under Article 1215, 16, or 22A of this Code. 13    (j) With respect to actions taken in compliance with this 14Section, including all good-faith determinations regarding 15companies as required by this Section, the retirement system 16and Illinois Investment Policy Board are exempt from any 17conflicting statutory or common law obligations, including any 18fiduciary duties under this Article and any obligations with 19respect to choice of asset managers, investment funds, or 20investments for the retirement system's securities portfolios.21    (k) It is not the intent of the General Assembly in 22enacting this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly to 23cause divestiture from any company based in the United States 24of America. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall 25consider this intent when developing or reviewing the list of 26restricted companies.   HB2780- 20 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1    (l) If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 99th 2General Assembly or its application to any person or 3circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 4or application does not affect other provisions or 5applications of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 6Assembly that can be given effect without the invalid 7provision or application.8    If any provision of Public Act 100-551 or its application 9to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 10of that provision or application does not affect other 11provisions or applications of Public Act 100-551 that can be 12given effect without the invalid provision or application. 13    If any provision of Public Act 102-118 or its application 14to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 15of that provision or application does not affect other 16provisions or applications of Public Act 102-118 that can be 17given effect without the invalid provision or application. 18    If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 19General Assembly or its application to any person or 20circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 21or application does not affect other provisions or 22applications of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 23Assembly that can be given effect without the invalid 24provision or application. 25    If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 104th 26General Assembly or its application to any person or   HB2780- 21 -LRB104 11964 JDS 22057 b1circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 2or application does not affect other provisions or 3applications of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 4Assembly that can be given effect without the invalid 5provision or application.6(Source: P.A. 102-118, eff. 7-23-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 7102-1108, eff. 12-21-22.)